North Carolina, session 2025, SB913.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-76.100 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-76.100. Regulation of wireless communication devices.
(a) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Wireless communication device. – Any portable wireless device that has the
capability to provide voice, messaging, or other data communication between
two or more parties, including the following:
a. Cellular telephones.
b. Tablet computers.
c. Laptop computers.
d. Paging devices.
e. Two-way radios.
f. Gaming devices.
g. Smart watches.
(2) Wireless communication policy. – A policy governing the use of wireless
communication devices by students.
(b) The governing body of a public school unit shall establish a wireless communication
policy. At a minimum, except as permitted in subsection (c) of this section, the policy shall
prohibit students from using, displaying, or having a wireless communication device turned on
during instructional time.as follows:
(1) For students in kindergarten through grade eight, at any time on school
premises.
(2) For students in grades nine through 12, at any point during the school day
except as required for assessments issued as part of the Statewide Testing
Program pursuant to Part 2 of Article 10A of this Chapter. Policies established
pursuant to this subdivision may allow wireless communication devices prior
to the start of the school day or after the conclusion of the school day.
(c) A wireless communication policy shall allow student use of a wireless communication
device during instructional time as follows:
(1) If authorized by a teacher for educational purposes or for use in the event of
an emergency. The governing body may establish parameters to be followed
by a teacher in granting authorizations.
*S913-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) As required by the student's individualized education program or section 504
(29 U.S.C. § 794) plan.
(3) As required to manage a student's health care, in accordance with a
documented medical condition.
…."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide support to governing bodies of public school units in
implementing policies pursuant to G.S. 115C-76.100, as amended by this act.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Page 2 Senate Bill 913-First Edition